Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.230.170

Study of constitutions compulsory—Rules.

The study of the Constitution of the United States and the Constitution of the state of Washington shall be a condition prerequisite to graduation from the public and private high schools of this state. The superintendent of public instruction shall provide by rule for the implementation of this section. The superintendent of public instruction may adopt a rule permitting students who meet the criteria in RCW 28A.230.122 to meet the prerequisite through noncredit-based study.

[ 2011 c 203 s 3; 2006 c 263 s 403; 1985 c 341 s 1; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.080. Prior: (i) 1925 ex.s. c 134 s 1; RRS s 4898-1. (ii) 1925 ex.s. c 134 s 2; RRS s 4898-2. Formerly RCW 28A.02.080, 28.02.080, and 28.02.081.]

NOTES:

Findings—Purpose—Part headings not law—2006 c 263: See notes following RCW 28A.150.230.